Washington statutes.
RCW 43.386.100

Exemption—Department of licensing—Drivers' licenses, permits, and identicards.

Nothing in this chapter applies to the use of a facial recognition matching system by the department of licensing pursuant to RCW 46.20.037.

[ 2020 c 257 s 12.]